Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 15 Attachment, Replevin and Garnishment

Cross references. —

As to attachment of goods covered by negotiable instruments, see § 34.1-7-602.

Revision of chapter. —

Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3, revised this chapter by repealing and recreating former §§

1-15-101

through

1-15-407

and

1-34-101

through 1-34-118 as present §§

1-15-101

through

1-15-425

.Sections

1-15-501

through

1-15-511

were added by Laws 1987, ch. 85, § 1.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by Laws 1987, ch. 198, has been attempted, but, where appropriate, annotations to cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections where it was felt they would be useful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Appeal bond distinguished. —

It will be assumed that bond given under the statute relating to appeals as required by the court to stay execution in attachment pending writ of error is not a forthcoming bond under this section, but was conditioned to pay the judgment if affirmed. J. J. Crable & Son v. O'Connor, 21 Wyo. 460, 133 P. 376,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1913), (decided under prior law),.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

See case note, “Constitutional Law — Due Process — Replevin —
Right to Notice and Hearing Prior to Deprivation of Property. Fuentes v. Shevin, 407 U.S. 67, 32 L. Ed. 2d 556, 92 S. Ct. 1983, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 42 (1972),” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 315 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

6 Am. Jur. 2d Attachment and Garnishment § 1 et seq.66 Am. Jur. 2d Replevin § 1 et seq.

Residence of partnership for purposes of statutes authorizing garnishment on ground of nonresidence, 9 ALR2d 471.

What is an action for “debt” within garnishment statute, 12 ALR2d 787.

Remedy of replevin where agent, employed to purchase personal property, buys it for himself, 20 ALR2d 1140.

Taxable costs and disbursements as including expenses for bond, 90 ALR2d 448.

Issue in garnishment as triable to court or to jury, 19 ALR3d 1393.

Garnishment against executor or administrator by creditor of estate, 60 ALR3d 1301.

Recovery of damages for mental anguish, distress, suffering, or the like, in action for wrongful attachment, garnishment, sequestration or execution, 83 ALR3d 598.

Employee retirement pension benefits as exempt from garnishment, attachment, levy, execution or similar proceedings, 93 ALR3d 711.

7 C.J.S. Attachment § 1 et seq.; 38 C.J.S. Garnishment § 1 et seq.; 77 C.J.S. Replevin § 1 et seq.